Rhode Island, session 2026, HB8156.
It is enacted by the General Assembly as follows:
SECTION 1. Chapter 12-29 of the General Laws entitled "Domestic Violence Prevention
Act" is hereby amended by adding thereto the following section:
12-29-13. Domestic violence and sexual assault survivor services fund.
(a) The general assembly finds and declares that domestic and sexual violence is a serious
public health problem in Rhode Island, resulting in numerous severe injuries and deaths annually
and significant first responder services, health and court costs, and that evidence-based domestic
violence and sexual assault direct services programs are critical lifesaving tools to mitigate the
continuing toll that such violence takes on our communities, cities, and towns. With decreased
available federal funding for survivor services, the availability of state funding for such victim
services is even more important. It is therefore in the best interest of the state to establish a fund to
promote effective programs providing expert direct victim services for survivors of domestic
violence and sexual assault in Rhode Island.
(b) Domestic violence and sexual assault survivor services fund.
(1) There is established the domestic violence and sexual assault survivor services fund, to
be administered by the Victim of Crime Act (VOCA) administrator for the State of Rhode Island
(“DVSASS Fund Administrator”)
(2) The domestic violence and sexual assault survivor services fund (“fund”) monies shall
be used to fund evidence-based direct services nonprofit organizations with the primary purpose of
providing services and advocacy for victims of domestic violence, sexual assault, stalking,

trafficking and dating violence in the State of Rhode Island.
(3) The fund shall be established with a one-time investment of one million dollars
($1,000,000) from the general fund in its inaugural year. Thereafter, the fund shall be sustained by
ten percent (10%) of proceeds from any settlement entered by the attorney general resulting from
a multi-state initiative, not to exceed five million dollars ($5,000,000) per settlement. The fund
shall be eligible and empowered to receive and deposit any monies from philanthropic donations.
(4) The DVSASS administrator shall convene a domestic violence and sexual assault
survivor services fund statewide advisory committee for the fund comprised of those with
knowledge, experience, training, and/or expertise in the field of prevention of domestic violence,
sexual assault, stalking, trafficking and dating violence. The committee members shall include, but
shall not limited to, the executive director of the Rhode Island Coalition Against Domestic
Violence, or designee; the executive director of Sojourner House, or designee; the executive
director of Day One, or designee; the director of the department of health, or designee; the director
of the department of human services, or designee; the attorney general, or designee; and the general
treasurer, or designee; and the director of the department of public safety grant administration
office, or designee.
(c) The domestic violence and sexual assault survivor services fund committee shall be
responsible for stewarding the fund and decisions related to the funding of nonprofit organizations
providing services and advocacy for victims of domestic violence, sexual assault, stalking,
trafficking and dating violence in the State of Rhode Island, and shall:
(1) Develop a plan and budget for distribution of funds;
(2) Develop criteria for awarding and distributing funds to eligible nonprofit organizations
whose primary missions include reducing domestic violence and/or sexual assault in Rhode Island;
(3) Issue requests for proposals to providers, organizations, firms, or entities that will
provide services to the committee; and
(4) Review proposals for the funds and make final determination of grant awards.
(d) The DVSASS administrator shall monitor and report annually on the use and impact of
the fund, including a detailed accounting of expenditures and funded programs. The annual report
shall be posted on the department of public safety website and transmitted to the general assembly
no later than February 28, 2027 and each year thereafter; and
(e) The DVSASS administrator shall promote the general development and sustaining of
trauma-informed services and specialized advocacy for victims of domestic violence, sexual
assault, stalking, trafficking and dating violence in Rhode Island.
LC005784 - Page 2 of 4

SECTION 2. This act shall take effect upon passage.
========
LC005784
========
LC005784 - Page 3 of 4